Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-3] Applicability. (a) This
chapter applies to:

(1) A fiduciary acting under a will or power of
attorney executed before, on, or after July 1, 2016;

(2) A personal representative acting for a decedent
who died before, on, or after July 1, 2016;

(3) A conservatorship proceeding commenced before,
on, or after July 1, 2016; and

(4) A trustee acting under a trust created before,
on, or after July 1, 2016.

(b) This chapter applies to a custodian if the
user resides in this State or resided in this State at the time of the user's
death.

(c) This chapter does not apply to a digital
asset of an employer used by an employee in the ordinary course of the
employer's business. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Revision Note

"July 1, 2016" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next